Utah statutes.
53-2a-812.   Governor to declare location of emergency seat of government.

(1)  Whenever, due to an emergency resulting from the effects of a disaster, it becomes imprudent, inexpedient, or impossible to conduct the affairs of the state government in Salt Lake City, Utah, the governor shall:

(a)  by proclamation, declare an emergency temporary location for the seat of government in Utah; and

(b)  take whatever action and issue whatever orders are necessary for an orderly transition of the affairs of the state government to that emergency temporary location.

(2)  That emergency temporary location shall remain as the seat of government until the Legislature establishes a new location by law, or until the emergency is declared to be ended by the governor and the seat of government is returned to its normal location.

(3)  Local governments may provide, by ordinance, for temporary emergency locations for the seat of government.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

